Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-530
Health claim form; violation; penalty; license revocation.

Any person who knowingly violates or knowingly aids or abets in the violation of the Standardized Health Claim Form Act or who fails to perform any duty under such act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any issuer who violates the act shall be subject to license revocation by the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 58.